Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2531
Adopted referendum measure; reenactment or return to original form; restrictions; failure of referendum; effect.

If a majority of the electors voting on the referendum measure shall vote in favor of such measure, the law subject to the referendum shall be repealed or amended. A measure repealed or amended by referendum shall not be reenacted or returned to its original form except by a two-thirds majority of the members of the governing body. No such attempt to reenact or return the measure to its original form shall be made within one year of the repeal or amendment of the measure by the electors. If the referendum measure does not receive a majority vote, the ordinance shall immediately become effective or remain in effect.

Laws 1982, LB 807, § 31.